Washington statutes.
RCW 18.96.220

Application—Professions and activities not affected.

This chapter does not affect or prevent:

(1) The practice of architecture, land surveying, engineering, geology, or any recognized profession by persons not licensed as landscape architects;

(2) Drafters, clerks, project managers, superintendents, and other employees of landscape architects from acting under the instructions, control, or supervision of their employers;

(3) The construction, alteration, or supervision of sites by contractors or superintendents employed by contractors or the preparation of shop drawings in connection therewith;

(4) Owners or contractors under chapter 18.27 RCW from engaging persons who are not landscape architects to observe and supervise site construction of a project;

(5) Qualified professional biologists as referenced in chapter 36.70 RCW from providing services for natural site areas that also fall within the definition of the practice of landscape architecture without a violation of this chapter;

(6) The preparation of construction documents including planting plans, landscape materials, or other horticulture-related elements;

(7) Individuals from making plans, drawings, or specifications for any property owned by them and for their own personal use;

(8) The design of irrigation systems; and

(9) Landscape design on residential properties.

[ 2009 c 370 s 18.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 370 ss 1-16, 18, 20, and 21: See note following RCW 18.96.010.

Finding—2009 c 370: See note following RCW 18.96.010.